California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Upon the filing of the street superintendent’s report and amended assessment the clerk shall fix a time and place for a hearing upon the amended assessment and shall give notice of the hearing by publication. The notice shall contain a statement of the time fixed for the hearing upon the amended assessment and any objections thereto, which time shall not be less than 15 days from the first publication of the notice. The notice shall contain a reference to the original assessment and to the improvement proceedings, and shall refer to the report and map or plat of the amended assessment for particulars and no other description of the lots or parcels of land affected thereby shall be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8733.

All persons interested in the original assessment, or in the lands affected thereby or in the bonds secured thereby, may, at the time of the hearing or at the time to which the hearing may be continued, appear and protest against the amended assessment. At the hearing the legislative body shall hear and determine all objections to the division of the assessments and shall confirm or modify the same. All determinations and decisions of the legislative body shall be conclusive upon all persons entitled to object under the provisions of this section. Final action of the legislative body upon the report and amended assessment shall be taken on or before the fifteenth day of July of any year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8734.

The clerk shall file the amended assessment as confirmed or modified by the legislative body with the auditor, who shall annually thereafter enter upon the assessment roll the installments becoming due on each component part of the original parcel opposite a description of the respective parcels so assessed. The amount charged for fees and costs as shown on the amended assessment as to each parcel shall be entered upon the assessment roll and shall be collected along with the first installment of the amended assessment. The street superintendent shall deposit all such costs and fees in the general fund of the treasury.

When a city is conducting the proceedings and collections upon the assessments are made by county officials the city clerk shall transmit a copy of the amended assessment to the county auditor.

The amended assessment shall be accompanied by an amended map or plat prepared pursuant to Section 8731. Such amended map or plat shall be designated “amended assessment diagram amending Assessment No. ____, Assessment District ____, State of California.” The amended map or plat shall substantially conform to the requirements and specifications provided for in Section 3114, and shall be filed by the clerk in the office of the county recorder. The county recorder may charge an appropriate fee for the expense incurred in filing the amended map or plat. The map or plat shall be cross-indexed by the recorder to the original assessment diagram which it amends.

The amended map or plat shall include on its face that it amends the assessment diagram for (here insert name or number of assessment district or both name and number of assessment district, together with city or county or both city and county), State of California prior recorded at Book ____ of Maps of Assessment Districts at page ____, in the office of the County Recorder for the County of ____, State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.5. ALTERNATIVE PROCEDURE FOR DIVISION OF LAND AND BOND [8740. - 8740.5.]

8740.

The procedures of this part are alternative to Part 10 of this division, relating to division of land and bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------

8740.1.

If any lot or parcel of land upon which there is an unpaid assessment represented by bonds issued under this division is subdivided, including a division into condominium interests as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, or the ownership of a portion of such lot or parcel of land is transferred to another person, the owner of any interest in any of the lots or parcels into which the original lot or parcel has been divided shall file an application in writing with the street superintendent. The application shall indicate how the original lot or parcel has been divided or transferred, request the street superintendent to apportion the amount remaining unpaid on the assessment in accordance with the division, and be accompanied by a fee in an amount to be fixed by the legislative body for each separate part or parcel of land into which the original lot or parcel has been divided or transferred. The street superintendent shall deposit all such fees in the treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

8740.2.

Upon receipt of the application and fee the street superintendent shall apportion to each separate part of the original lot or parcel of land the proportionate part of the amount remaining unpaid on the assessment that would have been levied thereon had the lot or parcel of land been so divided at the time the original assessment was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------

8740.3.

(a) When the apportionment has been made, an application signed by all persons owning an interest in the original lot or parcel of land may be filed with the street superintendent requesting that the assessment as apportioned be recorded.

(b) The street superintendent shall send to the underwriter or other original purchaser of any bonds which may be outstanding a notice, by certified or registered mail, that an apportionment of an assessment has been made and the numbers and amounts thereof and that, unless a request for a hearing is received within 14 days from the date of mailing of the notice, the apportioned assessments shall be recorded. If a request for a hearing is received, a report shall be filed and hearing shall be scheduled, noticed, and held in accordance with Part 10 (commencing with Section 8730).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

8740.4.

When the street superintendent has ascertained that the application is signed by all the necessary persons, and that no request for a hearing has been received, he shall thereupon amend the recorded diagram and assessment to conform to such division and apportionment and assign new assessment numbers to each separate part of the original lot or parcel of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------

8740.5.

The street superintendent shall file the amended assessment with the auditor, who shall annually thereafter enter upon the assessment roll the installments becoming due on each component part of the original parcel opposite a description of the respective parcels so assessed.

When a city is conducting the proceedings and collections upon the assessments are made by county officials, the street superintendent shall transmit a copy of the amended assessment to the county auditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.7. BOND ANTICIPATION NOTES [8745. - 8746.4.]

8745.

The legislative body may, by resolution, borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this division, but which have not been sold and delivered, issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor, and renew the notes from time to time. The maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed three years from the date of delivery of the original notes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8745.2.

The principal and interest on the bond anticipation notes may be paid from any money available for their payment. Any portion of the principal or interest which is due and payable shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of bonds in anticipation of which the notes were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8745.4.

The proceeds of bond anticipation notes issued pursuant to this part may be used for any purpose for which the bonds in anticipation of which the notes were issued may be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8745.6.

The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the legislative body has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue which have been previously sold and less the amount of other bond anticipation notes previously issued and still outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8745.8.

The legislative body may provide, in its resolution authorizing the issuance of bond anticipation notes, that the note shall be subject to call and redemption prior to maturity, at the option of the legislative body, at the price or prices which are fixed in the resolution, but not to exceed a premium of 6 percent of the par value of the note subject to redemption. The resolution shall fix the method of giving notice of redemption to the holders of the notes to be redeemed and the price or prices at which the note shall be subject to redemption. Any notes that are subject to call and redemption prior to maturity shall contain a recital to that effect on their face, and no note shall be subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless it contains that recital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8746.

The bond anticipation notes may be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8746.2.

The bond anticipation notes and the resolution authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the legislative body authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8746.4.

The legislative body shall provide a remedy in its resolution authorizing the issuance of bond anticipation notes if the anticipated bonds cannot be sold at the time or in the amount specified in the resolution or if any default occurs with respect to the notes. Any remedy which is so provided shall limit the obligations of property owners within the area subject to assessment to the amount of the assessment authorized and levied, except that the legislative body may enter into an agreement with any of the property owners within the district pledging some or all of the property of those property owners who are a party to the agreement as additional security for the notes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. ADVANCE RETIREMENT OF BONDS [8750. - 8756.]

8750.

By proceeding in accordance with the provisions of this part the treasurer may advance the maturity of any bond to the second day of March or September in any year and pay and cancel the same whenever there is sufficient surplus moneys in the redemption fund for its retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 16.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8751.

Notice of advanced maturity shall be given in writing to the registered holder or owner of the bond by registered or certified mail or personal service. Service or mailing of the notice shall be made at least 30 days before the date fixed for advanced maturity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8751.5.

In the event the treasurer receives for payment any interest coupon from a bond for which notice of advanced maturity has been given without the bond being surrendered to him or her, he or she shall mail a copy of the notice of advanced maturity to the address given for payment of the coupon and, if the coupon received is for interest which has ceased to accrue on the bond by reason of its advanced maturity, shall also return the interest coupon with the copy of notice. Failure of the holder or owner of the bond to receive the additional notice shall not affect the advancing of the maturity of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 9.5.)
-------------------------------------------

8752.

If notice of advanced maturity is given, the bond shall mature and become payable on the date fixed for maturity in the notice. The holder or owner of the bond may, prior to the date of advanced maturity, with the consent of the treasurer, surrender it and receive the principal and interest thereon to the date of payment together with the redemption premium provided for the bond. If the bond has not been sooner surrendered on the date fixed for advanced maturity, the treasurer shall set aside to the credit of the owner of the bond the amount of principal and accrued interest then due on the bond together with the redemption premium and the bond shall then be deemed to have matured and interest shall cease to accrue on the bond. The amount so set aside shall upon demand and upon the surrender and cancellation of the bond be paid to the holder or owner of the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

8753.

The cost of serving or publishing the notice of advanced maturity shall be paid from the redemption fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8754.

More than one bond may be covered in a single notice of advanced maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8755.

Prior to the surrender of any bond or the setting aside of any funds, the treasurer may waive and vacate any notice of advanced maturity upon being tendered for cancellation some other bond or bonds of an equivalent amount and of a maturity not earlier than that noticed, if 10 days’ notice of his intention so to do is first given by mail or otherwise to the holder or owner of the bond noticed for advanced maturity and such holder or owner has not objected to such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8756.

In selecting bonds for retirement, the treasurer shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 8768. The decision of the treasurer in selecting bonds for retirement shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud. The treasurer shall make provision for returning to owners releasing unpaid assessments under Part 8 all interest not accrued less the premium and interest paid on the bonds retired and the cost of administering retirement of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1140.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11.1. ALTERNATIVE PROCEDURE FOR COLLECTING ASSESSMENTS AND ADVANCE RETIREMENT OF BONDS [8760. - 8769.]

8760.

The procedures of this part are alternative to Part 8 (commencing with Section 8680) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 8750) relating to the partial or full payment of assessments and advance retirement of bonds. Except as otherwise provided, Part 8 (commencing with Section 8680) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 8750) apply. When it is proposed to proceed under this part, it shall be so stated in the resolution of intention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

8766.

The owner of assessed land, except land which has been ordered to judicial foreclosure pursuant to Section 8830, may prepay the assessment and remove the lien of the assessment by paying to the treasurer all of the following:

(a) The amount of any delinquent installments of principal and interest, together with penalties accrued to the date of prepayment.

(b) The unpaid, nondelinquent principal of the assessment, including principal posted to the tax roll for the current fiscal year but not yet paid.

(c) An allowance for redemption premium, calculated by multiplying the amount of the unmatured principal by the redemption premium percentage stated in the bonds. Unmatured principal excludes principal due during the fiscal year of prepayment.

(d) A reasonable fee, fixed by the treasurer, for the cost of administering the prepayment and the advance redemption of bonds.

(e) Interest accrued to the next call date of the bonds. The next call date is the next bond interest payment date which is not less than 90 days after the date of prepayment. Credit shall be given, or a refund provided, for installments of interest posted to the current tax roll and actually paid.

(f) A credit for the reserve fund calculated pursuant to Section 8881.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

8766.5.

The owner of assessed land, except land which has been ordered to judicial foreclosure pursuant to Section 8830, may prepay the assessment in part and remove the lien of the assessment in part by paying to the treasurer all of the following:

(a) The amount of any delinquent installment of principal and interest, together with penalties accrued to the date of prepayment.

(b) A portion of the unpaid, nondelinquent principal of the assessment in increments of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) An allowance for redemption premium, calculated by multiplying the amount of the unmatured principal being prepaid by the redemption premium percentage stated in the bonds.

(d) A reasonable fee, fixed by the treasurer, for the cost of administering the prepayment and the advance redemption of bonds.

(e) Interest accrued to the next call date of the bonds. The next call date is the next bond interest payment date which is not less than 90 days after the date of prepayment.

(f) A credit for the reserve fund calculated pursuant to Section 8881.

When an assessment has been partially prepaid, the treasurer shall issue a revised auditor’s record for that parcel, showing the proportionate reduction in assessment installments. Thereafter, the treasurer shall levy subsequent installments at the reduced rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

8767.

Upon receiving a partial or full prepayment of an assessment, the treasurer shall deposit it in an assessment prepayment subaccount of the bond redemption fund. All prepayments may be commingled in a single account. From the account, the treasurer shall make disbursements as follows:

(a) The administrative fee shall be deposited in the general fund of the city.

(b) Delinquent principal, interest, and penalties shall be transferred to the redemption fund for the bonds. If a special reserve fund has been established for the bonds and has been depleted on account of the delinquencies, the delinquent amounts and penalties shall be transferred instead to the special reserve fund.

(c) The installment of principal due in the fiscal year of prepayment shall be transferred to the redemption fund for the bonds.

(d) Interest accrued to the next call date shall be transferred to the redemption fund for the bonds.

(e) The balance in the assessment prepayment account shall be used to advance the maturity of bonds to the next call date, as provided in Part 11 (commencing with Section 8750). The amount of bonds to be retired shall be the maximum for which principal and redemption premium may be paid in full from the prepayment account. Accrued interest on bonds to be retired shall be paid from the redemption fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

8768.

The treasurer shall select bonds for retirement in such a way that the ratio of outstanding bonds to issued bonds shall be approximately the same in each annual series insofar as possible. Within each annual series, bonds shall be selected for retirement by lot.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

8769.

Before issuing bonds pursuant to this division, the legislative body shall determine, and shall declare in the resolution of intention, one of the following:

(a) The city will obligate itself to advance available funds from the city treasury to cure any deficiency which may occur in the bond redemption fund. If the legislative body determines to so declare under this subdivision, the legislative body may provide further security for the assessment bonds by creating an improvement district pursuant to the Benefit Assessment Act of 1982.

(b) The city will not obligate itself to advance available funds from the city treasury to cure any deficiency which may occur in the bond redemption fund. A determination not to obligate itself shall not prevent the city from, in its sole discretion, so advancing funds.

The determination made pursuant to this section shall be clearly stated in the text of the bonds issued pursuant to this division, and the title of the bonds shall include the words “Limited Obligation Improvement” in the event that the declaration in subdivision (b) is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. REDEMPTION FUND DEFICIENCIES [8770. - 8784.]

8770.

If it appears to the treasurer that there is danger of an ultimate loss accruing to the bondholders for any reason, he or she shall withhold payment on all matured bonds and interest and report the facts to the legislative body so that proper action may be taken by that body to equitably protect all bondholders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8771.

On receipt of the report, the legislative body shall fix a date for hearing thereon. The clerk shall give notice of the hearing by posting for 10 days. At the hearing the legislative body shall determine whether in its judgment there will ultimately be insufficient money in the redemption fund to discharge the unpaid bonds and interest. If it determines that in its judgment there will be no such shortage, it shall direct the treasurer to pay matured bonds and interest as long as there is available money in the redemption fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 24.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8772.

If the legislative body determines that in its judgment there will be a shortage in the redemption fund, it shall direct the treasurer to pay to the holders of all outstanding and unpaid bonds such proportion thereof as the amount of funds on hand bears to the total amount of the unpaid principal of the bonds and the interest which has accrued or will accrue thereon. Similar proportionate payments shall thereafter be made periodically as moneys come into the redemption fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 25.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8773.

In order to facilitate the making of proportionate payments, the holders of outstanding bonds shall surrender them to the treasurer for registration and cancellation. Upon cancellation each holder shall be credited with the amount of his bond so canceled. Thereupon the treasurer shall by warrant pay to each holder the proportionate amount of principal and accrued interest due on his or her bonds as may be available from time to time out of the money in the redemption fund. Interest shall cease on payments made on account of principal from the date of payment, but interest shall continue to run on the unpaid principal at the rate specified in the bonds until payment thereof be made. No premiums shall be paid on payments made in advance of the due date. If bonds are not surrendered for registration and payment the treasurer shall give notice to the holder thereof by registered mail, at the holder’s address as last known to the treasurer, of the amount available for payment. Thereupon interest shall cease as to the amount so available for payment 10 days from the date of mailing of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8774.

The legislative body may hold supplemental hearings on like notice and such other and supplemental orders may be made from time to time as may be equitable and proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8775.

If a deficiency occurs in the redemption fund with which to pay past due bonds, past due interest, or bonds or interest which will become due during the current tax collecting year, but it does not appear to the treasurer that there will be an ultimate loss to the bondholders, he shall pay matured bonds as presented and make interest payments when due as long as there are available funds in the redemption fund, in the following order of priority:

(1) All matured interest payments shall be made before the principal of any bonds is paid.

(2) Interest on bonds of earlier maturity shall be paid before interest on bonds of later maturity.

(3) Within a single maturity, interest on lower-numbered bonds shall be paid before interest on higher-numbered bonds.

(4) The principal of bonds shall be paid in the order in which the bonds are presented for payment. Any bond which is presented but not paid shall be assigned a serial number according to the order of presentment and shall be returned to the bondholder.

Bonds not paid when presented, and interest payments not paid when due, shall bear interest at the rate stated in the bonds, without compounding, until paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 27.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.

When funds become available for the payment of any bond which was not paid upon presentment, the treasurer shall notify the registered owner thereof by registered mail to present the bond for payment. If the bond is not presented for payment within 10 days after the mailing of the notice, interest shall cease to run on the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 28.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8778.

If a deficiency remains in the redemption fund after one year from the issuance of the bonds, the legislative body may require all persons interested to appear before it at a day, hour and place fixed by it for a hearing and to show cause why a supplemental assessment should not be made to pay for the cost and incidental expenses of the original work done upon which the original assessments were made upon which the bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8779.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication, and shall also be posted by the street superintendent in the same manner as provided by the law pursuant to which the work was done for the posting of notices of the passage of the resolution of intention. The first publication of the notice and the posting shall be completed 10 days before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8780.

At the time set for the hearing the legislative body shall proceed to hear any person appearing and may determine whether or not such deficiency was due to the fact that the original assessment for such cost and incidental expenses was not apportioned equitably or in accordance with benefits. The hearing may be postponed from time to time. If it appears to the legislative body that the amount apportioned to any lot was less than the amount which such lot should equitably bear according to the benefit which it received from the improvement, the legislative body may levy a supplemental assessment apportioning to such lot the additional sums which it should equitably bear according to such benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8781.

The cost of the publication and posting of the notice and of making the supplemental assessment may be included in the supplemental assessment. A copy of the order levying the supplemental assessment shall be recorded in the office of the street superintendent and from and after such recording, the sum therein levied on any lot shall be and constitute a lien thereon and thereafter bear interest at the rate specified in the bonds. The several amounts levied by the supplemental assessment shall be extended on the next succeeding tax rolls to be delivered to the tax collector and shall be collected in the manner provided for the collection of installments of the original assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8782.

The legislative body may provide in its order levying the supplemental assessment that the supplemental assessments may be collected in annual installments during the remaining term of years during which the bonds run, an equal proportion of principal coming due in each of the remaining years. However, any property owner may pay the whole of the supplemental assessment subsequent to the order of the legislative body and before the amount has been extended on the tax roll, whereupon interest shall cease on such assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8783.

All money collected on the supplemental assessment shall be paid into the redemption fund and be applied to the payment of the costs of publishing and posting the notice of hearing and of making the supplemental assessment and then to the payment of the bonds and interest thereon. After satisfaction of the bonds, repayment, if possible, of all funds collected on the supplemental assessment shall be made to those persons paying the same out of recoveries had through the collection of the delinquent installments of the assessments upon which the bonds were originally issued and of the interest and penalties thereon, and then out of any surplus remaining in the redemption fund after repayment to the city of any special taxes levied by it for the purpose of advancing funds under Part 13 (commencing with Section 8800) less its recovery on the sale or redemption of the properties assessed and any costs incurred by it under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8784.

If there is a surplus remaining in the redemption fund after payment of all bonds and the interest thereon, that surplus shall first be applied to repayment to the city of any special taxes levied by it for the purpose of advancing funds under Part 13 (commencing with Section 8800) less its recovery on the sale or redemption of the properties assessed, and also of any costs incurred by it under this division. The remainder shall be repaid in accordance with the provisions of Section 8783 to persons paying supplemental assessments, if any, and the balance may be proportionately credited upon the final installments due upon the assessments securing the bonds and repaid to those persons whose assessments have been previously paid or may be transferred to the general fund of the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13. SALE FOR DELINQUENCY [8800. - 8809.]

8800.

Upon default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest on any assessment or reassessment, the lands securing those installments and assessments shall become tax-defaulted in the same manner in which real property in the city becomes tax-defaulted for the nonpayment of general city taxes, and shall be subject to redemption in the same manner and to the same extent that real property in the city which has become tax-defaulted for the nonpayment of general city taxes may be redeemed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.

If any lot or parcel of land becomes tax-defaulted property for nonpayment of taxes and of any installment of the assessment thereon, or of the penalties, interest, or costs on the same, or for the nonpayment of any installment of the assessment or of the penalties, interest, or costs on the same, the declaration of default pursuant to Section 3436 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and the deed issued pursuant to Section 3708 of that code, are primary evidence of the regularity of all proceedings had prior thereto, and shall be conclusive evidence of all things of which bonds issued upon the security thereof are conclusive evidence, and prima facie evidence of the regularity of all proceedings subsequent to the issuance of the bonds, and the deed conveys to the grantee the absolute title to the lands described therein, free of all incumbrances, except the lien for other state, county, and city taxes, unpaid installments, interest, and penalties under the same proceeding, and unpaid installments, interest, and penalties, the lien of which is subordinate thereto, and except all public improvement assessments which may have priority thereover.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

The city may pay and transfer into the redemption fund the amount of the delinquent assessment and of the delinquent interest for which the property has become tax-defaulted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

If a county or a city whose taxes are collected by the county is conducting the proceedings and the county or city has advanced available funds either in performance of its obligations in proceedings wherein the assessment was levied prior to September 17, 1986, or under subdivision (a) of Section 8769, or voluntarily under subdivision (b) of Section 8769, the tax collector shall account to the county or the city for any moneys received upon redemption or from the sale of the property. In that case, for the purposes of this division, the county or the city shall be entitled to reimbursement of any amounts so advanced from any moneys so received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

If there are no available funds in the treasury with which to make payment of the amount of the delinquent assessment and interest for which the property was declared to be in default, the tax collector shall make demand upon the legislative body that a suitable amount be included in the next tax levy for the purpose of providing funds with which to make the payment. However, the period of redemption from the declaration of default shall not be extended thereby nor shall the rights or privileges of the property owner be affected.

This section applies only to bonds representing unpaid assessments, which assessments were confirmed before June 6, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

If the city has made advances as provided in Section 8803 with respect to any installment and any succeeding installment of the assessment or of the interest on the assessment is not paid in any future year, the property shall not be declared in default unless there has previously been a redemption from such declaration or unless under the law the property is then being declared in default for delinquent taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8806.

Notwithstanding Section 8805, if a city has advanced available funds either in performance of its obligations in proceedings wherein the assessment was levied prior to September 17, 1986, or under subdivision (a) of Section 8769, the city shall, from time to time when due, pay and transfer into the redemption fund the amount of any future delinquent installments of the assessment and interest thereon pending redemption, and no redemption shall be made until any subsequent payments, with interest and penalties, are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8808.

The city shall have the right to advance and pay any other taxes wherever necessary to protect its interest in property against which there is a delinquent assessment. It may also, at its discretion, temporarily transfer moneys into the redemption fund from other funds in which the moneys are not immediately needed. If the city has determined to obligate itself to use available funds to cure any deficiency in the redemption fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8769, it shall temporarily transfer available funds to the redemption fund upon determining that a deficiency exists. The moneys so transferred are to be used to pay sums due from the redemption fund and to be retransferred therefrom out of the first available receipts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 959, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8809.

The legislative body, shall, at the time of fixing the annual tax rate and levying the taxes to be collected for general city purposes, levy a special tax upon the taxable property in the city for the purpose of making advances under this part, and also for the purpose of paying installments of the assessment or of the interest thereon, which the city is required to pay under Section 8806, but not to exceed for each local improvement ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessable property in any one year. The special tax shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for city purposes, and shall be computed, entered and collected in the same manner, and by the same persons and at the same time and with the same penalties and interest as are other taxes of the city.

This section applies only to bonds representing unpaid assessments, which assessments were confirmed before June 6, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 14. FORECLOSURE BY ACTION [8830. - 8837.]

8830.

(a) As a cumulative remedy, if any assessment or reassessment or installment thereof, or of any interest thereon, together with any penalties, costs, fees, and other charges accruing under applicable taxation provisions are not paid when due, the legislative body may order that the same be collected by an action brought in the superior court to foreclose the lien thereof as provided by this part.
